Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2934.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 16.2 of Title 76, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Bodily injury" means any physical, any mental,
psychological or emotional injury, death, or any combination
thereof;
2. "Criminal act of another" means any act or conduct which is
prohibited by law and could result in punishment by a governmental
entity; and
3. "Property damage" means any injury to, or loss of use of,
real or personal property or both.
Req. No. 14258 Page 1

B. No person or entity shall have civil liability under any
theory of law or equity for bodily injury or property damage arising
out of or resulting from the criminal act of another, including
where committed by an employee or agent, except where the person or
entity upon which such civil liability is sought to be imposed has
first been convicted of being a criminal accomplice in the
commission of such criminal act.
C. The immunity from civil liability required by this section
shall apply regardless of whether the person who committed the
criminal act which caused bodily injury or property damage is
apprehended, prosecuted, or convicted as a result of the criminal
conduct.
D. The provisions of this section shall provide immunity from
civil liability for simple negligence but shall not provide immunity
from civil liability for willful, wanton, or malicious acts of
negligence or for gross negligence.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14258 AQH 12/01/25


Req. No. 14258 Page 2